NO.25 A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0103f1822300
25 |
A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY |
---|---|
DESCRIPTION
|
• A/C compressor magnetic clutch does not engage when the A/C switch is turned on.
|
POSSIBLE CAUSE
|
• Improper refrigerant charge amount
• Open A/C switch magnetic clutch
• Open circuit between A/C relay and A/C magnetic clutch
• Poor ground of A/C magnetic clutch
• Improper A/C magnetic clutch clearance
• Refrigerant pressure switch is stuck open
• A/C relay is stuck open
• Improper A/C cut-off control
• Open circuit between A/C switch and PCM through both refrigerant pressure switch and A/C amplifier
|
Diagnostic Procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
RESULTS |
ACTION |
---|---|---|---|
1
|
Perform the self-test function using the M-MDS.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
|
Yes
|
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
• Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
• PCM control relay stuck open
• Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
• Poor connection to vehicle body ground
|
Yes
|
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
|
||
2
|
Disconnect the A/C compressor connector.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch to the ON position.
Is there correct voltage at the terminal of the A/C compressor magnetic clutch connector?
Specification
More than 10.5 V
|
Yes
|
Inspect for ground condition of the magnetic clutch on the A/C compressor.
If ground condition is normal, inspect the magnetic clutch coil for an open circuit.
|
No
|
Go to the next step.
|
||
3
|
Disconnect the refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Connect jumper wire between terminals of refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Turn the A/C switch on and set the blower fan at any speed.
Measure the PCM terminal 32 voltage.
Is the voltage below 1.0 V?
|
Yes
|
Inspect refrigerant pressure switch operation.
If switch is normal, go to the next step.
|
No
|
Inspect the following:
• A/C switch is stuck open
• Open circuit between refrigerant pressure switch and PCM terminal 32
• Open circuit of blower motor fan switch and resistor (if blower motor does not operate)
• Evaporator temperature sensor and A/C amplifier
|
||
4
|
Inspect the A/C cut-off operation.
Does the A/C cut-off work properly?
|
Yes
|
Go to the next step.
|
No
|
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to the A/C cut-off system inspection results.
|
||
5
|
Remove the jumper wire from the switch connector.
Reconnect the connector to the refrigerant pressure switch.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch on.
Does the fan operate?
|
Yes
|
Inspect for a stuck open A/C relay.
Replace if necessary.
|
No
|
Inspect following and repair or replace if necessary:
• Refrigerant charging amount
• Seized A/C compressor
|
||
6
|
Verify test results.
• If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
• If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
|